test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_juuha_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kiehâ:
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Nom: kiehâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Gen: kievâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Acc: kievâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Ill: kiehân
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Loc: kievâst
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Com: kievváin
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Abe: kievâttáá
    kiehâ+N+Ess: kiehhân
    kiehâ+N+Par: kiehhâd
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Nom: kievah
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Gen: kievâi
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Acc: kievâid
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Ill: kievváid 
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Loc: kievâin
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Com: [kievâiguin, kievâigijn]
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Abe: kievâittáá

  Noun - juáhu: # ok LAAVU
    juáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  juáhu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  juávu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  juávust
    juáhu+N+Sg+Com:  juávvoin
    juáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  juávuttáá
    juáhu+N+Ess:  juáhhun
    juáhu+N+Par:  juáhhud
    juáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  juávuh
    juáhu+N+Pl+Gen: juávui
    juáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  juávuid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  juávvoid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  juávuin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Com:  [juávuiguin, juávuigijn]
    juáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  juávuittáá

  Noun - mááhu: # ok LAAVU
    mááhu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááhu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Gen:  máávu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Sg+Loc:  máávust
    mááhu+N+Sg+Com:  mávvoin
    mááhu+N+Sg+Abe:  mávuttáá
    mááhu+N+Ess:  mááhhun
    mááhu+N+Par:  mááhhud
    mááhu+N+Pl+Nom:  máávuh
    mááhu+N+Pl+Gen: [máávui, mávui]
    mááhu+N+Pl+Acc:  máávuid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Ill:  mávvoid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Loc:  máávuin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Com:  [mávuiguin, mávuigijn]
    mááhu+N+Pl+Abe:  mávuittáá

  Noun - ruáhu: # ok KALLU
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruáhu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruávu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruávu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruávust
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávvoin
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruávuttáá
    ruáhu+N+Ess:  ruáhhun
    ruáhu+N+Par:  ruáhhud
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruávuh
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Gen: ruávui
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruávuid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávvoid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruávuin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Com:  [ruávuiguin, ruávuigijn]
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruávuittáá

  Noun - saahâ:
    saahâ+N+Sg+Nom: saahâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Gen: saavâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Acc: saavâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Ill: saahân
    saahâ+N+Sg+Loc: saavâst
    saahâ+N+Sg+Com: savváin
    saahâ+N+Sg+Abe: savâttáá
    saahâ+N+Ess: saahhân
    saahâ+N+Par: saahhâd
    saahâ+N+Pl+Nom: saavah
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: [saavâi, savâi] 
    saahâ+N+Pl+Acc: saavâid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Ill: savváid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Loc: saavâin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Com: [savâiguin, savâigijn]
    saahâ+N+Pl+Abe: savâittáá

  Noun - laahâ:
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: lavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahhân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahhâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavâi, lavâi]
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: [lavâiguin, lavâigijn]
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavâittáá
     
  Noun - viehâ:
    viehâ+N+Sg+Nom: viehâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Gen: vievâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Acc: vievâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Ill: viehân
    viehâ+N+Sg+Loc: vievâst
    viehâ+N+Sg+Com: vievváin
    viehâ+N+Sg+Abe: vievâttáá
    viehâ+N+Ess: viehhân
    viehâ+N+Par: viehhâd
    viehâ+N+Pl+Nom: vievah
    viehâ+N+Pl+Gen: vievâi
    viehâ+N+Pl+Acc: vievâid
    viehâ+N+Pl+Ill: vievváid 
    viehâ+N+Pl+Loc: vievâin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Com: [vievâiguin, vievâigijn]
    viehâ+N+Pl+Abe: vievâittáá

  Noun - kaastâ:
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Nom: kaastâ
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Gen: kaastâ
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Acc: kaastâ
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Ill: kaastân
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Loc: kaastâst
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Com: kastáin
    kaastâ+v1+N+Sg+Abe: kastâttáá
    kaastâ+v1+N+Ess: kaastân
    kaastâ+v1+N+Par: kaastâd
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Nom: kaastah
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [kaastâi, kastâi]
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Acc: kaastâid
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Ill: kastáid
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Loc: kaastâin
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Com: [kastâiguin, kastâigijn]
    kaastâ+v1+N+Pl+Abe: kastâittáá
